Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 20. Nuclear Regulatory Agreement

§ 35-11-2001.
Authorization to negotiate transfer of certain nuclear regulatory functions to the state; scope of regulated material.

The governor, on behalf of the state, is authorized to contact the nuclear regulatory commission to express the intent of the state of Wyoming to enter into an agreement under section 274 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. § 2021, as amended, with the nuclear regulatory commission providing for the assumption by the state of regulatory authority over source material involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling and byproduct material, as defined in section 11e.(2) of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. § 2014(e)(2), as amended. The nuclear regulatory commission shall maintain regulatory authority over all other source material, section 11e.(1), (3) and (4) byproduct material and special nuclear material as defined in the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. § 2014, as amended, and the activities reserved under section 274 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. § 2021, as amended.

The department shall serve as the lead agency for the regulation of source material involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling and the associated byproduct material. The department is authorized to enforce the requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq., as amended, under the agreement reached between the state and the nuclear regulatory commission as provided in section 274 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. § 2021, as amended.

The governor, through the department, is authorized to negotiate all aspects of a potential agreement under this section between the state of Wyoming and the nuclear regulatory commission. The governor is authorized to enter into a final agreement with the nuclear regulatory commission for the regulation of source material involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling and the associated byproduct material.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 7, § 3.

The categories of materials governed by this article, as agreed upon by the nuclear regulatory commission and the state, are source material involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling and the associated byproduct material, as defined in section 11e.(2) of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. § 2014(e)(2), as amended. This article does not govern independent or commercial laboratory facilities that possess, use or accept byproduct material. The nuclear regulatory commission shall retain regulatory authority over independent or commercial laboratory facilities.

History.

2015 ch. 60, § 1, effective February 27, 2015; 2016 ch. 7, §§
2, 3, effective February 29, 2016; 2017 ch. 27, § 2, effective February 17, 2017.

The 2016 amendments.
—

The 2016 first amendment, by ch. 7 § 2, in (a), deleted “federal” following “authorized to contact the”, deleted “responsibilities relating to the regulation of source materials from uranium mining and milling and the wastes associated with the recovery, mining and milling of such source materials” following “assumption by the state of”, and added “regulatory authority over source material from recovery or milling and byproduct material included under section 274 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954,
42 U.S.C. § 2021, as amended. The nuclear regulatory commission shall maintain regulation over the activities reserved under section 274 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954,
42 U.S.C. § 2021, as amended.” at the end; rewrote (b), which read as: “The department of environmental quality shall serve as the lead agency for the regulation of source materials from uranium mining and milling and the wastes associated with the recovery, mining and milling of such source materials in the state of Wyoming under any proposed agreement negotiated under this section”; in (c), deleted “federal” preceding “nuclear regulatory commission” in the first and second sentence, substituted “material from recovery or milling and the byproduct material generated” for “materials from uranium mining and milling and the wastes associated with the recovery, mining and milling of such source materials”, substituted “article” for “section. A final agreement under this section shall include all necessary components of a program to regulate source materials from uranium mining and milling and the wastes associated with the recovery of such source materials”; and deleted (d) which read: “The department is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.”

The second 2016 amendment, ch. 7 § 3, repealed former (d), which read: “The department is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.”

The 2017 amendment

, substituted “involved in uranium or thorium” for “from” following “source material” throughout the section; rewrote (a); in (b) and (c) added “associated” preceding “byproduct material” and deleted “generated pursuant to the requirements of this article in the state of Wyoming” following “by product material”; and added (e).

Laws 2017, ch. 27, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

§ 35-11-2002.
Authority of department to enforce article; rulemaking.

Except as provided in this act, no person shall acquire, own, possess, transfer, offer or receive for transport or use any source material involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling and the associated byproduct material without having been granted a license therefore from the department or the nuclear regulatory commission. The department is authorized to regulate and penalize any unlicensed activities involving source material involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling and the associated byproduct material.

The council, upon recommendation from the director, is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purpose of this article.

To the extent it is not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, article 4 of this chapter shall apply to all licenses issued and actions taken under this article.

History.

2016 ch. 7, § 1, effective February 29, 2016; 2017 ch. 27, § 2, effective February 17, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, in (a), substituted “involved in uranium or thorium” for “from” following “source material” twice, substituted “associated” for “created” preceding “byproduct material” twice; and in (b), deleted “reasonable” following “promulgate”.

Laws 2017, ch. 27, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 7 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 29, 2016.

§ 35-11-2003.
Licensure; license requirements; enforcement actions.

The director is authorized to issue licenses to implement the requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq., as amended. Licenses issued under this section shall also authorize the possession and use of source materials involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling and the associated byproduct material as provided in this article. The director is further authorized to enforce license provisions in accordance with this article. The department shall recognize existing and effective licenses issued by the nuclear regulatory commission. The department shall also recognize licenses issued by other agreement states only for source material involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling or the associated byproduct material.

The director is authorized to use license conditions to address matters specific to particular licensees. The department may impose additional license conditions when required to protect public health and safety.

The director shall grant an exemption from a license requirement, including an exemption from the requirement to obtain a license, if the exemption provides adequate protection of public health and safety and is compatible with nuclear regulatory commission requirements.

The department shall inspect a licensee’s operation to ensure compliance with license conditions, as determined necessary by the administrator of the land quality division to protect public health and safety. The department shall also inspect proposed facilities and proposed expansion of existing facilities to ensure that unauthorized construction is not occurring. Licensees, permittees and applicants for a license or permit shall obtain and grant the department access to inspect their facilities, source material involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling and the associated byproduct material at such times and frequencies as determined necessary by the department to protect public health and safety.

When issuing a license for byproduct material under this article, the director shall require licensees to provide an approved financial assurance arrangement consistent with nuclear regulatory commission requirements provided in 10 C.F.R. part 40, appendix A, as amended. The arrangement shall cover the cost estimate and the payment of the charge for decommissioning, long term surveillance and control pursuant to 10 C.F.R. part 40, appendix A.

The director is authorized to suspend licenses, impound source material involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling and the associated byproduct material and conduct enforcement actions in accordance with this article, article 9 of this chapter and rules and regulations promulgated under this act. The director is authorized to suspend licenses and conduct enforcement actions in accordance with department rules and regulations and this article. In cases of an imminent threat to public health and safety, the director is authorized to issue an emergency order immediately suspending a license and any associated activity as provided in W.S.

35-11-115

. The director is authorized to suspend or revoke a license for repeated or continued noncompliance with program requirements pursuant to its rules and regulations and this article. The director is also authorized to seek injunctive relief and impose civil or administrative monetary penalties as provided by law.

History.

2016 ch. 7, § 1, effective February 29, 2016; 2017 ch. 27, § 2, effective February 17, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, in (a), substituted “involved in uranium or thorium” for “from” following “source materials”, added “the associated” preceding “byproduct material”, and added the last sentence; in (d), substituted “facilities” for “mining operations”, substituted “or milling and the associated byproduct material at such times” for “or milling operations and byproduct material generated at such times;” in (e), deleted “criterion 9” following “appendix A,” and rewrote the last sentence, which formerly read: “The arrangement shall contain sufficient funds to cover the costs of decommissioning and, to the extent applicable, long-term surveillance and maintenance for conventional source material milling and heap leach facilities,”; and in (f), added “impound source material involved in uranium or thorium recovery or milling and the associated byproduct material” near the beginning.

Laws 2017, ch. 27, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 7 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 29, 2016.

§ 35-11-2004.
License conditions; termination of licenses.

The department shall prescribe conditions in licenses issued, renewed or amended for an activity that results in production of byproduct material to minimize or, if possible, eliminate the need for long-term maintenance and monitoring before the termination of the license.

Prior to terminating any license the administrator of the land quality division shall obtain a determination from the nuclear regulatory commission that the licensee has complied with the commission’s decontamination, decommissioning, disposal and reclamation standards.

Prior to terminating a byproduct material license the department shall ensure the ownership of a disposal site and the byproduct material resulting from licensed activity are transferred to:

The state of Wyoming; or

The federal government if the state declines to acquire both the site and the byproduct material.

Upon the transfer of a disposal site or the byproduct material resulting from licensed activity to the federal government, funds collected for decommissioning and long-term surveillance shall also be transferred to the federal government.

History.

2016 ch. 7, § 1, effective February 29, 2016; 2019 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
in (c)(ii), deleted “the site, the byproduct material, or”.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 7 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 29, 2016.

§ 35-11-2005.
Fees.

The department shall adopt a fee structure which accounts for the full cost of the program, including positions authorized by this article and other positions assessed to implement the program developed under this article.

The department may assess fees for the regulation of source material under article 4 of this chapter, including but not limited to the review and processing of mining permit applications.

History.

2017 ch. 27, § 1, effective February 17, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 194, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved March 9, 2017.